Massachusetts, session 194th, SD3057.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, there shall be a
special commission established to investigate the availability, affordability, and regulatory
treatment of homeowners insurance for manufactured and mobile homes in the Commonwealth.
The scope of the commission shall include but not be limited to: (i) the causes of rising
premiums for manufactured and mobile homeowners; (ii) the current extent of insurer
participation in this market segment and the impacts of market concentration on policy pricing
and accessibility; (iii) the role of state regulations, statutes, and administrative practices in
contributing to or alleviating these insurance challenges; (iv) the adequacy and limitations of the
FAIR Plan and other existing consumer protections for manufactured homeowners; (v) how the
Commonwealth compares to other states in terms of regulatory burden, coverage availability,
and rate trends for manufactured housing; and (vi) potential policy or legislative solutions
of 2

designed to expand coverage options, improve affordability, and ensure long-term market
stability for homeowners residing in manufactured housing communities.
SECTION 2. The commission shall consist of the following members: the house and
senate chairs of the joint committee on financial services, who shall serve as co-chairs; the
commissioner of insurance or a designee; the attorney general or a designee; the secretary of the
executive office of housing and livable communities or a designee; one member appointed by the
speaker of the house of representatives; one member appointed by the president of the senate;
one member appointed by the minority leader of the house of representatives; one member
appointed by the minority leader of the senate; one representative from the Massachusetts
Manufactured Housing Association, appointed by its board of directors; one municipal official
from a city or town with a significant number of manufactured home communities, appointed by
the Massachusetts Municipal Association; and one consumer advocate with experience in elder
housing appointed by the governor.
SECTION 3. The commission shall submit its report and findings, together with any
recommendations or drafts of legislation, to the clerks of the house of representatives and the
senate, the joint committee on financial services, and the house and senate committees on ways
and means no later than twelve months after the passage of this act.
of 2